Massachusetts, session 194th, S1178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 133A of chapter 127 of the General Laws as it appears in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in the first sentence of the first paragraph, the 
phrases: “except prisoners confined to the hospital at the Massachusetts Correctional Institution, 
Bridgewater, except prisoners serving a life sentence for murder in the first degree who had 
attained the age of 18 years at the time of the murder and except prisoners serving more than 1 
life sentence arising out of separate and distinct incidents that occurred at different times, where 
the second offense occurred subsequent to the first conviction,”; and by inserting in the first 
paragraph after the phrase “of the minimum term fixed by the court under section 24 of chapter 
279.” the following sentence:- Provided, however, that in the case of a prisoner serving more 
than 1 life sentence arising out of separate and distinct incidents that occurred at different times, 

of 5 11 where the second offense occurred subsequent to the first conviction, such prisoner shall be 
eligible for parole 25 years after the start of the second or most recent sentence. 
SECTION 2. Amend Section 133C of chapter 127 of the General Laws at it appears in 
the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in the first paragraph, the phrase: 
“except prisoners serving a life sentence for murder in the first degree who had attained the age 
of 18 years at the time of the murder and prisoners confined to the hospital at the Massachusetts 
Correctional Institution, Bridgewater.” 
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 2 of chapter 265 of the General Laws as it appears 
in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the phrase: “not be eligible for parole 
pursuant to section 133A of Chapter 127.”, and inserting in place thereof the phrase:- shall be 
eligible for parole after a term of years fixed by the court pursuant to section 24 of chapter 279. 
SECTION 4. Amend subsection (b) of section 2 of Chapter 265 of the General Laws as it 
appears in the 2020 Official Edition, by inserting in the fourth line, after the words “term of 
years” :- but no more than 25 years, as. 
SECTION 5. Section 24 of chapter 279 of the General Laws as it appears in the 2014 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in the first paragraph, the phrase: “which shall 
be not less than 15 years nor more than 25 years,” and insert in place thereof the phrase:- of 15 
years; and by striking out the second paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the 
following paragraph:- 
In the case of a sentence to life imprisonment for murder in the first degree, the court 
shall fix a minimum term of 25 years; provided, however, that in the case of a person who 
committed the murder on or after the person’s fourteenth birthday and before the person’s 

of 5 33 eighteenth birthday, the court shall fix a minimum term of not less than 15 years nor more than 
20 years, after consideration of relevant mitigating and exacerbating circumstances; and 
provided, however, that in the case of a person sentenced to life imprisonment for murder in the 
first degree adjudicated solely by a verdict of felony murder or joint venture and where the 
offender is not the actual killer, committed on or after the person’s fourteenth birthday and 
before the person’s eighteenth birthday, the court shall fix a minimum term of not less than 10 
years nor more than 12 years. 
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, section 24 of chapter 279 of 
the General Laws as it appears in the 2014 Official Edition shall apply to any person found guilty 
of murder pursuant to subsections (a), (b) or (c) of section 2 of chapter 265 prior to or after the 
effective date of this act. 
SECTION 7. Subsection (b) of section 25 of chapter 279 of the General Laws as it 
appears in the 2020 Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting in the first paragraph after 
the words “for good conduct”, the following phrase:- provided, however, that in the case of a 
person so serving a life sentence, parole eligibility will commence after serving 25 years of said 
sentence. And by inserting after the last paragraph of subsection (b) of section 25 the following 
sentence:- Notwithstanding any other provision of law, section 25(b) shall apply to any person 
convicted as a habitual offender pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) of section 25 of chapter 279 
prior to or after the effective date of this act. 
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, except as provided by 
SECTION 1 of this act, no person shall be imprisoned for more than 25 years without a parole 
hearing at 25 years. 

of 5 55  SECTION 9. The Department of Corrections shall establish a Restorative Justice program 
within its prisons that is available to anyone sentenced to more than 25 years in prison in order to 
develop a plan of reconciliation.   
(a) The Restorative Justice program will allow the interaction between the prisoner and 
victims, family of the victims, the parties to a crime, and community members within the prison 
with the goal to identify and address harms and needs and obligations resulting from an offense 
in order to understand and reconcile the impact of that offense.  
(b) Participation in a prison-based restorative justice program shall be voluntary for 
offenders, victims, and surviving family and community members affected by the crime.  
(c) Participation in a prison-based restorative justice program shall not be used as 
evidence or as an admission of guilt, delinquency or civil liability in current or subsequent legal 
proceedings against any participant. Any statement made by an incarcerated person during the 
course of an assignment within a prison-based restorative justice program shall be confidential 
and shall not be subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding and no 
information obtained during the course of such assignment shall be used in any stage of a 
criminal investigation or prosecution or civil or administrative proceeding; provided, however, 
that nothing in this section shall preclude any evidence obtained through an independent source 
or that is inevitably discovered by lawful means from being admitted at such proceeding. 
(d) The Department of Corrections shall annually, not later than December 31, submit a 
report to the clerks of the House of Representatives and of the Senate, and the House and Senate 
chairs of the Joint Committee on the Judiciary and of Public Safety and Homeland Security 
regarding the implementation and operation of the program, the number of prisoners to which it 

of 5 77 is available, the number of prisoners that have participated, and any recommendations for change 
to the program.